District of Columbia statutes.
9-1117.04

Compact not creating agency relationship.

Each of the parties shall act solely on its own authority within the jurisdiction granted. This Compact shall not be construed as creating any agency relationship between the Parties.

March 31, 2000, D.C. Law 13-63, § 5, 46 DCR 9217

History

For temporary (90-day) authorization of the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see notes following § 9-1117.01.

Emergency Legislation